Hawaii statutes.
§431:9-105 Definitions. As used in
this article, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Adjuster":

(1) Means any individual who:

(A) Acts solely on behalf of either the
insurer or the insured, as an independent contractor or as an employee of an independent
contractor; and

(B) Investigates for, reports to, or adjusts
for the individual's principal relative to claims arising under insurance
contracts; but

(2) Does not include an individual who is:

(A) An attorney at law who adjusts insurance
losses from time to time incidental to the practice of the attorney's
profession;

(B) An adjuster of marine losses;

(C) A salaried employee of an insurer or
salaried employee of an adjusting corporation or an association owned or
controlled by an insurer; or

(D) An individual who acts for a self-insurer
or for an insured that administers its own group insurance contract.

"Independent adjuster" means an
adjuster representing the interests of the insurer.

"Independent bill reviewer":

(1) Means any individual who:

(A) Acts solely on behalf of either the
insurer as an independent contractor or as an employee of an independent
contractor; and

(B) Reviews or audits billings for medical
services; but

(2) Does not include an individual who is:

(A) A salaried employee of an insurer or
salaried employee of an adjusting corporation or an association owned or
controlled by an insurer; or

(B) A database provider for the insurer.

"Public adjuster" means an adjuster
employed by and solely representing the financial interests of the insured
named in the policy. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2; am L 1997, c 83, §2; am L 2000,
c 182, §8; am L 2002, c 155, §21; am L 2006, c 154, §14]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next